California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Except as provided for in subdivision (c), if an automotive repair dealer operates more than one place of business in this state, the director pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration of the specific place of business which has violated any of the provisions of this chapter. This violation,
 or action by the director, shall not affect in any manner the right of the automotive repair dealer to operate the automotive repair dealer’s other places of business.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the director may suspend, revoke, or place on probation the registration for all places of business operated in this state by an automotive repair dealer upon a finding that the automotive repair dealer has, or is, engaged in a course of repeated and willful violations of this chapter, or regulations adopted pursuant to it.

(d) (1) The director shall establish through regulation a program to certify providers of remedial training for automotive repair dealers who have violated this chapter, employees of automotive repair dealers who have violated this chapter, and
 persons identified pursuant to Section 9884 as directly or indirectly controlling or conducting an automotive repair dealer business that has violated this chapter.

(2) Remedial training shall be available only for violations involving documentation or recordkeeping, or that the bureau determines to be minor in nature. Remedial training shall not be available if the violation constitutes fraud. 

(e) For purposes of this section, “fraud” includes, but is not limited to, violations of this chapter involving misrepresentations and all of the following:

(1) Any act or omission that is included within the definition of either “actual fraud” or “constructive fraud,” as those terms are defined in
 Sections 1572 and 1573 of the Civil Code.

(2) A misrepresentation in any manner, whether intentionally false or due to gross negligence, of a material fact.

(3) A promise or representation not made honestly and in good faith.

(4) An intentional failure to disclose a material fact.

(5) Any act in violation of Section 484 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 471)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.76.

Notwithstanding Section 9889.20, an automotive repair dealer who prepares a written estimate for repairs pursuant to Section 9884.9 that includes replacement of a deployed airbag that is part of an inflatable restraint system, and who fails to restore the airbag that is part of an inflatable restraint system to its original operating condition, where the customer has paid for the replacement of the deployed airbag as provided in the estimate, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 430, Sec. 1.   (SB 869)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.8.

All work done by an automotive repair dealer, including all warranty work, shall be recorded on an invoice and shall describe all service work done and parts supplied. Service work and parts shall be listed separately on the invoice, which shall also state separately the subtotal prices for service work and for parts, not including sales tax, and shall state separately the sales tax, if any, applicable to each. If any used, rebuilt, or reconditioned parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that fact. If a part of a component system is composed of new
 and used, rebuilt or reconditioned parts, that invoice shall clearly state that fact. The invoice shall include a statement indicating whether any crash parts are original equipment manufacturer crash parts or nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash parts. One copy of the invoice shall be given to the customer and one copy shall be retained by the automotive repair dealer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.9.

(a) The automotive repair dealer shall give to the customer a written estimated price for labor and parts necessary for a specific job, except as provided in subdivision (e). No work shall be done and no charges shall accrue before authorization to proceed is obtained from the customer. No charge shall be made for work done or parts supplied in excess of the estimated price, or the posted price specified in subdivision (e), without the oral or written consent of the customer that shall be obtained at some time after it is determined that the estimated or posted price is insufficient and before the work not estimated or posted is done or the parts not estimated or posted are supplied. Written consent or authorization for an increase in the original estimated or posted price may be provided
 by electronic mail or facsimile transmission from the customer. The bureau may specify in regulation the procedures to be followed by an automotive repair dealer if an authorization or consent for an increase in the original estimated price is provided by electronic mail or facsimile transmission. If that consent is oral, the dealer shall make a notation on the work order of the date, time, name of person authorizing the additional repairs, and telephone number called, if any, together with a specification of the additional parts and labor and the total additional cost, and shall do either of the following:

(1) Make a notation on the invoice of the same facts set forth in the notation on the work order.

(2) Upon completion of the repairs, obtain the customer’s signature or initials to an acknowledgment of notice and consent, if there is an oral consent of the customer to
 additional repairs, in the following language:“I acknowledge notice and oral approval of an increase in the original estimated price.(signature or initials)”Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring an automotive repair dealer to give a written estimated price if the dealer does not agree to perform the requested repair.

(b) The
 automotive repair dealer shall include with the written estimated price a statement of any automotive repair service that, if required to be done, will be done by someone other than the dealer or his or her employees. No service shall be done by other than the dealer or his or her employees without the consent of the customer, unless the customer cannot reasonably be notified. The dealer shall be responsible, in any case, for any service in the same manner as if the dealer or his or her employees had done the service.

(c) In addition to subdivisions (a) and (b), an automotive repair dealer, when doing auto body or collision repairs, shall provide an itemized written estimate for all parts and labor to the customer. The estimate shall describe labor and parts separately and shall identify each part, indicating whether the replacement part is new, used, rebuilt, or reconditioned. Each crash part shall be identified on the written estimate and the
 written estimate shall indicate whether the crash part is an original equipment manufacturer crash part or a nonoriginal equipment manufacturer aftermarket crash part.

(d) A customer may designate another person to authorize work or parts supplied in excess of the estimated price, if the designation is made in writing at the time that the initial authorization to proceed is signed by the customer. The bureau may specify in regulation the form and content of a designation and the procedures to be followed by the automotive repair dealer in recording the designation. For the purposes of this section, a designee shall not be the automotive repair dealer providing repair services or an insurer involved in a claim that includes the motor vehicle being repaired, or an employee or agent or a person acting on behalf of the dealer or insurer.

(e) A written estimate is not required for an
 automotive repair dealer to perform any of the preventative maintenance services defined in Section 9880.1 if the customer authorizes the service and either of the following occurs:

(1) The service is performed free of charge.

(2) The total price for labor and parts necessary to perform the service is displayed in a place and manner conspicuous to the customer or is made available to and acknowledged by the customer at the automotive repair facility where the service is performed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 503, Sec. 3.   (AB 3141)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.10.

Upon request of the customer at the time the work order is taken, the automotive repair dealer shall return replaced parts to the customer at the time of the completion of the work excepting such parts as may be exempt because of size, weight, or other similar factors from this requirement by regulations of the department and excepting such parts as the automotive repair dealer is required to return to the manufacturer or distributor under a warranty arrangement. If such parts must be returned to the manufacturer or distributor, the dealer at the time the work order is taken shall offer to show, and upon acceptance of such offer or request shall show, such parts to the
 customer upon completion of the work, except that the dealer shall not be required to show a replaced part when no charge is being made for the replacement part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.11.

Each automotive repair dealer shall maintain any records that are required by regulations adopted to carry out this chapter. Those records shall be open for reasonable inspection by the chief or other law enforcement officials. All of those records shall be maintained for at least three years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.12.

All proceedings to deny, suspend, revoke, or place on probation a registration shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 97.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.13.

The expiration of a valid registration shall not deprive the director or chief of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation or disciplinary proceeding against an automotive repair dealer or to render a decision invalidating a registration temporarily or permanently.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.14.

The superior court in and for the county wherein any person carries on, or attempts to carry on, a business as an automotive repair dealer or as a mechanic in violation of the provisions of this chapter, or any regulation made pursuant to this chapter, shall, on application of the director or the chief, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such conduct. This section shall be cumulative to and shall not prohibit the enforcement of any other law.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure,
 except that the director or chief shall not be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of an adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.15.

The director may file charges with the district attorney or city attorney against any automotive repair dealer who violates the provisions of this chapter or any regulation made pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.16.

(a) A person required to have a valid registration under the provisions of this chapter shall not have the benefit of any lien for labor or materials, including the ability to charge storage fees in accordance with applicable laws, or the right to sue on a contract for motor vehicle repairs unless the person possesses a valid registration.

(b) The bureau may adopt regulations, as necessary, in accordance with Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 3067) of Title 14 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code and Section 22524.5 of the Vehicle Code, and any regulations of the Insurance Commissioner pertaining to vehicle towing or storage fees, or both, adopted pursuant to Sections 758.5 and 790.03 of the Insurance Code, to carry out the provisions of this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 6.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.17.

The bureau shall design and approve of a sign which shall be placed in all automotive repair dealer locations in a place and manner conspicuous to the public. That sign shall give notice that inquiries concerning service may be made to the bureau and shall contain the telephone number and Internet Web site address of the bureau. The sign shall also give notice that the customer is entitled to a return of replaced parts upon his or her request therefor at the time the work order is taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 572, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.18.

Nothing in the provisions of this chapter shall prohibit the bringing of a civil action against an automotive repair dealer by an individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.19.

The bureau may adopt, amend or repeal in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code such regulations as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter in the protection of the public from fraudulent or misleading advertising by an automotive repair dealer, including formulation of definitions, to the extent feasible, of the terms “fraud,” “guarantee,” and words of like import, and of “negligence,” and guidelines for the suspension and revocation of licenses. The bureau shall distribute to each registered repair dealer copies of this chapter and of the regulations
 adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.20.

All accusations against automotive repair dealers shall be filed within three years after the performance of the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, except that with respect to an accusation alleging fraud or misrepresentation as a ground for disciplinary action, the accusation may be filed within two years after the discovery, by the bureau, of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.21.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may, in his or her sole discretion, issue a probationary registration to an applicant subject to terms and conditions deemed appropriate by the director, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and for purposes of this section, when deciding whether to issue a probationary registration, the director shall request that an applicant with a dismissed conviction provide proof of that dismissal and shall give special consideration to applicants whose convictions have been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code.

(2) The director shall also take into account and consider any other reasonable documents or individual character references provided by the applicant that may serve as evidence of rehabilitation as deemed appropriate by the director.

(c) The director may modify or terminate the terms and conditions imposed on the probationary registration upon receipt of a petition from the applicant or registrant.

(d) For purposes of issuing a probationary registration to qualified new applicants, the director shall develop standard terms of probation that shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) A three-year limit on the individual probationary registration.

(2) A process to obtain a standard registration for applicants who were issued a probationary registration.

(3) Supervision requirements.

(4) Compliance and quarterly reporting
 requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 675, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

9884.22.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may revoke, suspend, or deny at any time any registration required by this article on any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided in this article. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) The director may deny a registration to an applicant on any
 of the grounds specified in Section 480.

(c) In addition to the requirements provided in Sections 485 and 486, upon denial of an application for registration to an applicant, the director shall provide a statement of reasons for the denial that does the following:

(1) Evaluates evidence of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant, if any.

(2) Provides the director’s criteria relating to rehabilitation, formulated pursuant to Section 482, that takes into account the age and severity of the offense, and the evidence relating to participation in treatment or other rehabilitation programs.

(3) If the director’s decision was based on the applicant’s
 prior criminal conviction, justifies the director’s denial of a registration and conveys the reasons why the prior criminal conviction is
 substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a registered automotive repair dealer.

(d) Commencing July 1, 2009, all of the following shall apply:

(1) If the denial of a registration is due at least in part to the applicant’s state or federal criminal history record, the director shall, in addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), provide to the applicant a copy of the applicant’s criminal history record if the applicant makes a written request to the director for a copy, specifying an address to which it is to be sent.

(A) The state or federal criminal history record shall not be modified or altered from its form or content as provided by the Department
 of Justice.

(B) The criminal history record shall be provided in such a manner as to protect the confidentiality and privacy of the applicant’s criminal history record and the criminal history record shall not be made available by the director to any employer.

(C) The director shall retain a copy of the applicant’s written request and a copy of the response sent to the applicant, which shall include the date and the address to which the response was sent.

(2) The director shall make that information available upon request by the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 487, the director shall conduct a hearing
 of a registration denial within 90 days of receiving an applicant’s request for a hearing. For all other hearing requests, the director shall determine when the hearing shall be conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 372, Sec. 6.   (AB 471)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revenue [9886. - 9886.4.]

9886.

All fees and revenues collected pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1544, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9886.1.

The director shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each month, for the month preceding, the amount and source of all fees and revenues received by the department pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, and at that time shall pay the entire amount of those fees and revenues into the State Treasury for credit to the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1544, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9886.2.

The money in the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund necessary for the administration of this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code is available to the department, when appropriated for those purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

9886.3.

The fees prescribed by this chapter shall be set by the director in an amount estimated to provide for the administration of this chapter within the limits of the following schedule:

(a) The automotive repair dealer registration fee is not more than two hundred dollars ($200), for each place of business in this state. 

(b) The annual renewal fee for an automotive repair dealer registration shall not be more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each place of business in this state, if renewed prior to its expiration date. 

(c) The renewal fee for a registration that is not renewed prior to its expiration date shall be 112 times the renewal fee required for a registration renewal prior to its expiration date, but not more than the renewal fee plus fifty dollars ($50).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 386, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9886.4.

All salaries, expenses, or costs incurred or sustained pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 44000) of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code shall be payable only out of the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1544, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licenses [9887.1. - 9887.5.]

9887.1.

The director shall have the authority to issue licenses for official lamp and brake adjusting stations and shall license lamp and brake adjusters. The licenses shall be issued in accordance with this chapter and regulations adopted by the director pursuant thereto. The director shall establish by regulation the terms of adjusters’ licenses as are necessary for the practical administration of the provisions relating to adjusters, but those terms shall not be for less than one nor more than four years. Licenses may be renewed upon application and payment of the renewal fees if the application for renewal is made within the 30-day period prior to the date of expiration. Persons whose licenses have expired shall immediately cease the activity requiring a license, but the director shall accept applications for renewal during the 30-day period following the date of expiration if they are accompanied by a new license fee. In no case shall a license be renewed where the application is received more than 30 days after the date of expiration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 1.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9887.5.)
-------------------------------------------

9887.2.

Each application for a new or renewal license shall be accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10) for a new license or five dollars ($5) for a renewal license. The application shall be made upon a form furnished by the director. It shall contain such information concerning the applicant’s background and experience as the director may prescribe, in addition to other information required by law. No license as a lamp or brake adjuster shall be issued or renewed unless the applicant has demonstrated his or her experience and qualifications in accordance with such standards and examinations as the director may prescribe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 2.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9887.5.)
-------------------------------------------

9887.3.

(a) Licenses issued by the director shall not be transferable.

(b) In the event of a change of name of a licensee, not involving a change of ownership, or of a change of address of a licensed station, the license shall be returned to the director for cancellation, and a new license application form shall be submitted. The director shall cancel the returned license and issue a new license for the unexpired term without fee.

(c) If the owner of a licensed station desires to vacate the license in favor of another license permitting a greater or lesser scope of activity, the license to be vacated shall be returned to the director for cancellation and an application shall be submitted for the new license accompanied by the ten-dollar ($10) new license fee.

(d) In the event of loss, destruction, or mutilation of a license issued by the director, the person to whom it was issued may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing satisfactory proof of such fact and paying a fee of two dollars ($2). Any person who loses a license issued by the director and who, after obtaining a duplicate, finds the original license shall immediately surrender the original license to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 967.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9887.5.)
-------------------------------------------

9887.4.

It is unlawful to violate any regulation adopted by the director pursuant to Articles 5, 6, and 7 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9887.5.)
-------------------------------------------

9887.5.

This article shall remain operative only until six months after the effective date of the regulations adopted by the director pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 7.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 5, commencing with Section 9887.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Lamp and Brake Adjusting Stations [9888.1. - 9888.4.1.]

9888.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Station” means a lamp adjusting station or a brake adjusting station. 

(b) “Licensed station” means a station licensed by the bureau pursuant to this chapter.

(c) “Licensed adjuster” means a person licensed by the bureau for adjusting lamps in licensed lamp adjusting stations or for adjusting brakes in licensed brake adjusting stations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 4.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9888.4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.2.

The director shall adopt regulations which prescribe the equipment and other qualifications of any station as a condition to licensing the station as an official station for adjusting lamps or brakes and shall prescribe the qualifications of adjusters employed therein.

After consulting with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the director may, by regulation, approve testing and calibrating equipment, which is capable of measuring or calibrating the standards imposed by statute and by rules and regulations, for use in official stations, and may approve the testing laboratories and the equipment they use to certify the performance of testing and calibrating equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 5.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9888.4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.3.

No person shall operate an “official” lamp or brake adjusting station unless a license therefor has been issued by the director. No person shall issue, or cause or permit to be issued, any certificate purporting to be an official lamp adjustment certificate unless he or she is a licensed lamp adjuster or an official brake adjustment certificate unless he or she is a licensed brake adjuster.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 6.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9888.4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.4.

An owner of a fleet of three or more vehicles who is not an interstate carrier may be licensed by the director as a licensed station, if the owner complies with the rules and regulations of the bureau. Those fleet owner stations shall not certify the adjustment of lamps or brakes except on vehicles which constitute the owner’s fleet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1433, Sec. 7.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 9888.4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.4.1.

This article shall remain operative only until six months after the effective date of the regulations adopted by the director pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 8.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 6, commencing with Section 9888.1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Vehicle Safety Systems Inspection [9888.5. - 9888.6.]

9888.5.

(a) The director shall develop inspection criteria and standards for specific safety systems and components of the vehicle in order to promote the safe and uniform installation, maintenance, and servicing of vehicle safety systems and components.

(b) The director shall issue vehicle safety systems inspection licenses to stations and technicians to conduct inspections of, and repairs to, safety systems of vehicles. The director may electronically issue these licenses.

(c) By January 1, 2024, the director shall adopt the regulations, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code), including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Inspection criteria and standards for specific safety systems and components of the vehicle in order to promote the safe and uniform installation, maintenance, and servicing of vehicle safety systems and components.

(2) The application fee and process for applicants, including any specialized application process for those licensees licensed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 9887.1) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 9888.1).

(3) The certificate of compliance fee and certification process for vehicles, including any specialized certification process for those vehicles certified pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 9889.15). The director shall prescribe a form for the certificate of compliance that contains, at a
 minimum, the date of issuance, the make and registration number of the vehicle, and the official license of the station.

(d) The vehicle safety systems inspection license shall replace licenses issued pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 9887.1) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 9888.1). Licenses issued in accordance with those articles shall remain valid until six months after the effective date of regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (c). A licensee with a license issued pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 9887.1) or Article 6 (commencing with Section 9888.1) shall thereafter be regulated under this article and shall apply for and be issued a vehicle safety systems inspection license under this article.

(e) The vehicle safety systems inspection certificate shall replace certificates issued pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 9889.15).
 Certificates issued in accordance with that article shall remain valid until six months after the director adopts regulations pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 681, Sec. 9.   (AB 1263)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9888.6.

(a) A licensee shall issue to the owner or driver of a vehicle a certificate of compliance on a form prescribed by the director if, after conducting an inspection of, and any necessary repair to, the safety systems of the vehicle, the licensee determines that the safety systems conform with the inspection criteria and standards adopted by the director.

(b) (1) The director may require a licensee to electronically transmit to the department a record of each certificate of compliance issued.

(2) The department may, for each transmission pursuant to this subdivision, charge a licensee a
 transaction fee established by the department that shall be only sufficient to cover the actual regulatory costs of administering those transmissions.

(c) The director may electronically transmit to the Department of Motor Vehicles certificates of compliance issued by licensees.

(d) (1) The director shall evaluate the feasibility of augmenting existing database systems to support the charging of fees with respect to, and the issuance and tracking of, certificates of compliance.

 (2) The director may enter into a contract for services necessary to maintain and operate an electronic certificate system for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 372, Sec. 9.   (AB 471)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Denial, Suspension and Revocation [9889.1. - 9889.10.]

9889.1.

Any license issued pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) may be suspended or revoked by the director. The director may refuse to issue a license to any applicant for the reasons set forth in Section 9889.2. The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 24.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.2.

The director may deny a license if the applicant or any partner, officer, or director thereof:

(a) Fails to meet the qualifications established by the bureau pursuant to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 9888.5) for the issuance of the license applied for.

(b) Was previously the holder of a license issued under this chapter which license has been revoked and never reissued or which license was suspended and the terms of the suspension have not been fulfilled.

(c) Has committed any act which, if committed by any licensee, would be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a
 license issued pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Has committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit whereby another is injured or whereby the applicant has benefited.

(e) Has acted in the capacity of a licensed person or firm under this chapter without having a license therefor.

(f) Has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, or been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of the license holder in question, and the time for appeal has elapsed or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, irrespective of an order granting probation following such conviction, suspending the imposition of sentence, or of a subsequent order under the provisions
 of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the plea or verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 25.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.3.

The director may suspend, revoke, or take other disciplinary action against a license as provided in this article if the licensee or any partner, officer, or director thereof:

(a) Violates any section of the Business and Professions Code that relates to his or her licensed activities.

(b) Is
 convicted of any crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licenseholder in question.

(c) Violates any of the regulations promulgated by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Commits any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit whereby another is injured.

(e) Has misrepresented a material fact in obtaining a license.

(f) Aids or abets an unlicensed person to evade the provisions of this chapter.

(g) Fails to make and keep records showing his or her transactions as a licensee, or fails to have the records available for inspection by the director or his or her duly authorized representative for a period of not less than three years after completion
 of any transaction to which the records refer, or refuses to comply with a written request of the director to make the record available for inspection.

(h) Violates or attempts to violate the provisions of this chapter relating to the particular activity for which he or she is licensed.

(i) Is convicted of a violation of Section 551 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 98.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.4.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The director may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw the person’s plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 14.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.5.

The director may take disciplinary action against any licensee after a hearing as provided in this article by any of the following:

(a) Imposing probation upon terms and conditions to be set forth by the director.

(b) Suspending the license.

(c) Revoking the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.6.

Upon the effective date of any order of suspension or revocation of any license governed by this chapter, the licensee shall surrender the license to the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.7.

The expiration or suspension of a license by operation of law or by order or decision of the director or a court of law, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the director of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceedings against such licensee, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

9889.8.
